South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S207.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1170(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) Beginning for the taxable year during which a resident individual taxpayer attains the age of sixty-five years, the resident individual taxpayer is allowed a deduction from South Carolina taxable income received in an amount not to exceed fifteen twenty thousand dollars reduced by any amount the taxpayer deducts pursuant to subsection (A) not including amounts deducted as a surviving spouse. If married taxpayers eligible for this deduction file a joint federal income tax return, then the maximum deduction allowed is fifteen twenty thousand dollars in the case when only one spouse has attained the age of sixty-five years and thirty forty thousand dollars when both spouses have attained such age. The amount of the tax deduction allowed pursuant to this section shall be annually adjusted. The annual inflation adjustment may not exceed four percent. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----